Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1703
Board of trade, defined.

Board of trade shall mean any person or group of persons engaged in buying or selling any commodity or receiving the same for sale on consignment, whether such person or group of persons is characterized as a board of trade, exchange, or other form of marketplace.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 3.